Utah statutes.
35A-3-112.   Assistance not assignable -- Exemption from execution,
garnishment, bankruptcy, or insolvency proceedings.
Public assistance provided under this chapter is not assignable, at law or in
equity, and none of the money paid or payable under this chapter is subject to
execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal process, or to the
operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.
